Utah statutes.
67-4a-210.   Property held by courts and public agencies.

(1)  Any intangible property held by the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of the United States government, or a state or a county or municipal subdivision of a state, or any of their authorities, agencies, instrumentalities, administrations, services, or other organizations that remains unclaimed for more than one year after it became payable or distributable is considered abandoned.

(2)  Property held, issued, or owing by the court is payable or distributable if:

(a)  the court has notified all persons whose names appear on the records of the court as having an unadjudicated claim to the property that the property is being held subject to the claim; and

(b)  no claim is made, or property remains after all claims are resolved.

(3)  A claim filed under Section 67-4a-501 for property reported by the court to the administrator under this Section may be referred to the court for adjudication of the claim.



Amended by Chapter 156, 2005 General Session

